apertium-ckb.ckb.dix
    <pardef n="فێ__n">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abs"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەک</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یانی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکەی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_cons"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="یش__consonantal"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکان</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یەکانی</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="بوون__clt_voc"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><j/></r></p><par n="poss__clt"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="poss__agr"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/></r></p><par n="ش__vocalic"/></e>
        <e><p><l>یانە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezalos"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>یە</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dem"/><s n="ezaclo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

      <e lm="ئاسۆ"><i>ئاسۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەژنۆ"><i>ئەژنۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەسپێ"><i>ئەسپێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەوێ"><i>ئەوێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئیمڕۆ"><i>ئیمڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پاڵتۆ"><i>پاڵتۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پەڕۆ"><i>پەڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پێ"><i>پێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ترێ"><i>ترێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جۆ"><i>جۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جێ"><i>جێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چاوەڕێ"><i>چاوەڕێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چەمەنتۆ"><i>چەمەنتۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خوێ"><i>خوێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دراوسێ"><i>دراوسێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="درۆ"><i>درۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دۆ"><i>دۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دەرپێ"><i>دەرپێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دێ"><i>دێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕادیۆ"><i>ڕادیۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕێ"><i>ڕێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زانکۆ"><i>زانکۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زەردەچۆ"><i>زەردەچۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زێ"><i>زێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شانۆ"><i>شانۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کرێ"><i>کرێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کیلۆ"><i>کیلۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گفتوگۆ"><i>گفتوگۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گوێ"><i>گوێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لادێ"><i>لادێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لاڕرێ"><i>لاڕرێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لیمۆ"><i>لیمۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مێ"><i>مێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نیوەڕۆ"><i>نیوەڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هاتوچۆ"><i>هاتوچۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هاوسێ"><i>هاوسێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هۆ"><i>هۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هەرمێ"><i>هەرمێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هەرمێ"><i>هەرمێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەبرۆ"><i>ئەبرۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="برۆ"><i>برۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بیرۆ"><i>بیرۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زکرێ"><i>زکرێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تێ"><i>تێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شێ"><i>شێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ژێرپێ"><i>ژێرپێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ترێ"><i>ترێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گفتووگۆ"><i>گفتووگۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چیمەنتۆ"><i>چیمەنتۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دینەمۆ"><i>دینەمۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="تابلۆ"><i>تابلۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="رێ"><i>رێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پاشکۆ"><i>پاشکۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دیسکۆ"><i>دیسکۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کرێ"><i>کرێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەژنۆ"><i>ئەژنۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نانی نیوەڕۆ"><i>نانی<b/>نیوەڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هۆ"><i>هۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گۆ"><i>گۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هۆ"><i>هۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="یانێ"><i>یانێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەمرۆ"><i>ئەمرۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="جێ"><i>جێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەلفوبێ"><i>ئەلفوبێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەمڕۆ"><i>ئەمڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕێ"><i>ڕێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕادیۆ"><i>ڕادیۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نیشتەجێ"><i>نیشتەجێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شانۆ"><i>شانۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕاستەوخۆ"><i>ڕاستەوخۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەستۆ"><i>ئەستۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ژێ"><i>ژێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هاوڕێ"><i>هاوڕێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="گوێ"><i>گوێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="هاوڕێ"><i>هاوڕێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئەرستۆ"><i>ئەرستۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خۆ"><i>خۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ناوخۆ"><i>ناوخۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="کۆ"><i>کۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لادێ"><i>لادێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="نانی نویوەڕۆ"><i>نانی<b/>نویوەڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ئۆیرۆ"><i>ئۆیرۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زێ"><i>زێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="مێزڕۆ"><i>مێزڕۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="فێ"><i>فێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="فێ"><i>فێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="ڕەبۆ"><i>ڕەبۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خوێ"><i>خوێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چەقۆ"><i>چەقۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پاڵتۆ"><i>پاڵتۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="بانیۆ"><i>بانیۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="شامپۆ"><i>شامپۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="رادیۆ"><i>رادیۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="خوێ"><i>خوێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="زانکۆ"><i>زانکۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="چەقۆ"><i>چەقۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="لادێ"><i>لادێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دۆ"><i>دۆ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="دێ"><i>دێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
      <e lm="پێ"><i>پێ</i><par n="فێ__n"/></e>
